District of Columbia statutes.
20-357

Exception for motor vehicles.

If the only property of a decedent is not more than 2 motor vehicles, the Mayor may transfer title to the motor vehicles in accordance with section 50-1501.02(d) . If title is transferred under this section, administration of the estate of the decedent is not necessary.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
This section is referenced in § 20-105.
1981 Ed., § 20-357.